District of Columbia statutes.
31-1701

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities and Banking.

(1A)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(2)

“Redomestication” means the transfer to the District the corporate domicile of an authorized foreign insurance company.

(3)

Repealed.

(4)

“Transferring insurer” means any authorized foreign insurance company seeking redomestication.

History

May 24, 1996, D.C. Law 11-127, § 2, 43 DCR 1559
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 44(a), 45 DCR 745
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 46(a), 52 DCR 2638

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-4301.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354, in par. (1), substituted “of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking” for “of Insurance and Securities Regulation”.